Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6297.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 3. (1) An individual is required to report under this act as follows: (a) A physician, dentist, physician's assistant, registered dental hygienist, medical examiner, nurse, person licensed to provide emergency medical care, audiologist, psychologist, physical therapist, physical therapist assistant, occupational therapist, athletic trainer, marriage and family therapist, licensed professional counselor, social worker, licensed master's social worker, licensed bachelor's social worker, registered social service technician, social service technician, a person employed in a professional capacity in any office of the friend of the court, school administrator, school counselor or teacher, law enforcement officer, member of the clergy, or regulated child care provider who has reasonable cause to suspect child abuse or child neglect shall make an immediate report to centralized intake by telephone, or, if available, through the online reporting system, of the suspected child abuse or child neglect. Within Not later than 72 hours after making an oral report by telephone to centralized intake, the reporting person shall file a written report as required in under this act. If the immediate report has been made using the online reporting system and that report includes the information required in a written report under subsection (2), that report is considered a written report for the purposes of this section and no additional written report is required. If the reporting person is a member of the staff of a hospital, agency, or school, the reporting person shall notify the person in charge of the hospital, agency, or school of his or her the reporting person's finding and that the report has been made, and shall make a copy of the written or electronic report available to the person in charge. A notification to the person in charge of a hospital, agency, or school does not relieve the member of the staff of the hospital, agency, or school of the obligation of reporting to the department as required by under this section. One report from a hospital, agency, or school is adequate to meet the reporting requirement. A member of the staff of a hospital, agency, or school shall not be dismissed or otherwise penalized for making a report required by under this act or for cooperating in an investigation. (b) A department employee who is 1 of the following and has reasonable cause to suspect child abuse or child neglect shall make a report of suspected child abuse or child neglect to the department in the same manner as required under subdivision (a): (i) Eligibility specialist. (ii) Family independence manager. (iii) Family independence specialist. (iv) Social services specialist. (v) Social work specialist. (vi) Social work specialist manager. (vii) Welfare services specialist. (c) Any employee of an organization or entity that, as a result of federal funding statutes, regulations, or contracts, would be prohibited from reporting in the absence of a state mandate or court order. A person An individual required to report under this subdivision shall report in the same manner as required under subdivision (a). (2) The written report or a report made using the online reporting system must contain the name of the child and a description of the child abuse or child neglect. If possible, the report shall must contain the names and addresses of the child's parents, the child's guardian, the persons individuals with whom the child resides, and the child's age. The report shall must contain other information available to the reporting person that might establish the cause of the child abuse or child neglect, and the manner in which the child abuse or child neglect occurred. (3) The department shall inform the reporting person of the required contents of the written report at the time the oral report is made by the reporting person. (4) The written report required in under this section must be mailed or otherwise transmitted to centralized intake. (5) Upon On receipt of a written report of suspected child abuse or child neglect, the department may shall provide copies to the prosecuting attorney, the county department of the county in which the child suspected of being abused or neglected resides or is found, and the probate court of the counties in which the child suspected of being abused or neglected resides and is found. Beginning on the effective date of the amendatory act that added this sentence, on receipt of the written report, the county department of the county in which the child suspected of being abused or neglected resides or is found shall immediately commence investigation and conduct an initial screening to determine whether the complaint meets the criteria for formal investigation, alternative response, or no further action. The county department of the county in which the child suspected of being abused or neglected resides or is found shall consider all of the following factors during the initial screening, as applicable: (a) The child's family history, as known locally. (b) Whether there are environmental issues. (c) Whether there are known patterns of abuse previously directed at the child. (d) The existence of culturally specific dynamics. (6) If an allegation, written report, initial screening determination, or subsequent investigation of suspected child abuse or child neglect indicates a violation of section 136b, 145c, 462a to 462h, or 520b to 520g of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.136b, 750.145c, 750.462a to 750.462h, and 750.520b to 750.520g, or a violation of section 7401c of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.7401c, involving methamphetamine has occurred, or if the allegation, written report, initial screening determination, or subsequent investigation indicates that the suspected child abuse or child neglect was committed by an individual who is not a person responsible for the child's health or welfare, including, but not limited to, a member of the clergy, a teacher, a teacher's aide, or an individual 18 years of age or older who is involved in a youth program, the county department of the county in which the child suspected of being abused or neglected resides or is found must transmit a copy of the allegation or written report and the results of any investigation to a law enforcement agency in the county in which the incident occurred. If an allegation, written report, initial screening determination, or subsequent investigation indicates that the individual who committed the suspected child abuse or child neglect is a child care provider and the county department of the county in which the child suspected of being abused or neglected resides or is found believes that the report has basis in fact, the county department of the county in which the child suspected of being abused or neglected resides or is found shall, within not later than 24 hours after completion of the allegation, written report, initial screening determination, or subsequent investigation, transmit a copy of the written report or the results of the investigation to the child care regulatory agency with authority over the child care provider's child care organization or adult foster care location authorized to care for a child. (7) If a local law enforcement agency receives an allegation or written report of suspected child abuse or child neglect or discovers evidence of or receives a report of an individual allowing a child to be exposed to or to have contact with methamphetamine production, and the allegation, written report, initial screening determination, or subsequent investigation indicates that the child abuse or child neglect or allowing a child to be exposed to or to have contact with methamphetamine production, was committed by a person responsible for the child's health or welfare, the local law enforcement agency shall refer the allegation or provide a copy of the written report and the results of any investigation to the county department of the county in which the abused or neglected child is found, as required by under subsection (1)(a). On receipt of a referral of an allegation or copies of the written report and results of any investigation, the county department of the county in which the abused or neglected child is found shall assign the case to an investigative staff and coordinate response timelines that are consistent with this state's policy. If an allegation, written report, or subsequent investigation indicates that the individual who committed the suspected child abuse or child neglect or allowed a child to be exposed to or to have contact with methamphetamine production, is a child care provider and the local law enforcement agency believes that the report has basis in fact, the local law enforcement agency shall transmit a copy of the written report or the results of the investigation to the child care regulatory agency with authority over the child care provider's child care organization or adult foster care location authorized to care for a child. Neither this This subsection nor or subsection (1) relieves does not relieve the department of its responsibilities to investigate reports of suspected child abuse or child neglect under this act. (8) For purposes of this act, the pregnancy of a child less than 12 years of age or the presence of a sexually transmitted infection in a child who is over 1 month of age but less than 12 years of age is reasonable cause to suspect child abuse or child neglect has occurred. (9) In conducting an investigation of child abuse or child neglect, if the department suspects that a child has been exposed to or has had contact with methamphetamine production, the department shall immediately contact the law enforcement agency in the county in which the incident occurred.